Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1110
Election contest; court; powers and duties.

Every court authorized to determine contested elections shall hear and determine such contested elections in a summary manner without any formal pleading. The contest shall be heard within fifteen days after the matter is at issue unless the contest is continued by mutual consent of the parties or for good cause shown.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 353.

In election contests, judges serve in the capacity of election inspectors, where the court's whole duty is to inspect and interpret the polls. McKay v. Bartels, 316 Neb. 235, 3 N.W.3d 920 (2024).